New York, session 2025-2026, S157.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 29 of subdivision (a) of section 1115 of the tax 2 law is REPEALED. 3 § 2. Subdivisions 9 and 10 of section 1118 of the tax law are 4 REPEALED. 5 § 3. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 1118 of the tax law, as 6 added by section 2 of part CC of chapter 59 of the laws of 2017, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 (b) Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, the 9 exclusion in paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall not apply to the 10 use within the state of property or a service purchased outside this 11 state by a nonresident that is not an individual, unless such nonresi- 12 dent has been doing business outside the state for at least six months 13 prior to the date such nonresident brought such property or service into 14 this state. For purposes of this paragraph, the exclusion in paragraph 15 (a) of this subdivision shall not apply to any nonresident that is not 16 an individual when the property purchased by such nonresident is a horse 17 or horses brought into the state for racing, regardless of whether such 18 nonresident has been doing business outside the state for at least six 19 months prior to the date such horse or horses were brought into the 20 state for racing. 21 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00596-01-5